District of Columbia statutes.
6-917

Appropriations authorized.

Except as herein otherwise authorized all expenses incident to the enforcement of this chapter shall be paid from appropriations made from time to time for that purpose in like manner as other appropriations for the expenses of the District of Columbia.

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 161, ch. 2073, § 17
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 889, ch. 1032
1973 Ed., § 5-632.
1981 Ed., § 5-717.